Utah statutes.
20A-11-201.   State office candidate -- Separate bank account for campaign
funds.
(1) (a)  Each state office candidate or the candidate's personal campaign
committee shall deposit each contribution and public service assistance
received in one or more separate campaign accounts in a financial institution.
(b)  The state office candidate or the candidate's personal campaign committee
may use the monies in those accounts only for political purposes.
(2)  A state office candidate or the candidate's personal campaign committee
may not deposit or mingle any contributions received into a personal or
business account.
(3)  If a person who is no longer a state office candidate chooses not to
expend the monies remaining in a campaign account, the person shall continue
to file the year-end summary report required by Section 20A-11-203 until the
statement of dissolution and final summary report required by Section
20A-11-205 are filed with the lieutenant governor.
(4) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b) and Section 20A-11-402, a
person who is no longer a state office candidate may not expend or transfer
the monies in a campaign account in a manner that would cause the former state
office candidate to recognize the monies as taxable income under federal tax
law.
(b)  A person who is no longer a state office candidate may transfer the
monies in a campaign account in a manner that would cause the former state
office candidate to recognize the monies as taxable income under federal tax
law if the transfer is made to a campaign account for federal office.
(5) (a)  As used in this Subsection (5) and Section 20A-11-204, "received"
means:
(i)  for a cash contribution, that the cash is given to a state office
candidate or a member of the candidate's personal campaign committee;
(ii)  for a contribution that is a negotiable instrument or check, that the
negotiable instrument or check is negotiated; and
(iii)  for any other type of contribution, that any portion of the
contribution's benefit inures to the state office candidate.
(b)  Each state office candidate shall report each contribution and public
service assistance to the lieutenant governor within 30 days after the
contribution or public service assistance is received.
